Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 6
DISTRIBUTIONS AND WITHDRAWAL

7-62-601. Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this part 6, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before the partner's withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events stated in the partnership agreement.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 444, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

Entire section R&RE, p. 456, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2246, § 138, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1444, § 136, effective July 1.

7-62-602. Withdrawal of general partner.

A general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner damages for breach of the partnership agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to the general partner. The withdrawal of a general partner who is also a limited partner shall not constitute the withdrawal of the partner as a limited partner or affect the partner's rights as a limited partner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 444, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1501, § 7, effective June 3.

7-62-603. Withdrawal of limited partner.

A limited partner may only withdraw from a limited partnership at the time or upon the happening of events stated in writing in the partnership agreement.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 444, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 456, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 789, § 15, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2246, § 139, effective July 1, 2004.

7-62-604. Distribution upon withdrawal.

Except as provided in this part 6, upon withdrawal, any withdrawing partner is entitled to receive any distribution to which the withdrawing partner is entitled under the partnership agreement, and, if not otherwise provided in the agreement, the withdrawing partner is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal, the fair value of the withdrawing partner's partnership interest in the limited partnership as of the date of withdrawal based upon the withdrawing partner's right to share in distributions from the limited partnership.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 445, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1444, § 137, effective July 1.

7-62-605. Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of the partner's contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the partner exceeds a percentage of that asset that is equal to the percentage in which the partner shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 445, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 456, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1444, § 138, effective July 1.

7-62-606. Right to distribution.

At the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner has the status of and is entitled to all remedies available to a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 445, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1445, § 139, effective July 1.

7-62-607. Limitations on distribution.

A partner may not receive a distribution from a limited partnership to the extent that, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests, exceed the fair value of the partnership assets.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 445, § 1, effective November 1.

Cross references:

For exclusions from the term "distribution" see §§ 7-60-146 (1) and 7-64-1004 (1).

7-62-608. Liability upon return of contribution.

If a partner has received the return of any part of the partner's contribution without violation of the partnership agreement or this article, the partner is liable to the limited partnership for a period of one year thereafter for the amount of the returned contribution, but only to the extent necessary to discharge the limited partnership's liability to creditors who extended credit to the limited partnership during the period the contribution was held by the partnership.

If a partner has received the return of any part of the partner's contribution in violation of the partnership agreement or this article, the partner is liable to the limited partnership for a period of three years thereafter for the amount of the contribution wrongfully returned.

A partner receives a return of the partner's contribution to the extent that a distribution to the partner reduces the partner's share of the fair value of the net assets of the limited partnership below the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to section 7-62-105, of the partner's contribution that has not been distributed to the partner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 445, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(3) amended, p. 457, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 2247, § 140, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1445, § 140, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 225, § 11, effective May 29.

Cross references:

For exclusions from the term "distribution" see §§ 7-60-146 (1) and 7-64-1004 (1).